2025 OCP APAC Summit Keynotes

The Open Compute Project is a vibrant community that spans the data center infrastructure worldwide. Though not a standards body, the OCP community forges new technology norms.
An ecosystem where industry players collaborate in a safe framework, shaping a versatile and diverse supply chain. From startups to hyperscalers, as well as research, academia, and investors, the OCP community is able to reduce procurement time, research efforts, expenses, development time, and even legal complexity.
For your projects. Participating in the OCP community gives you access to the latest technologies and talent, the chance to improve your skills and to drive impact in critical areas like energy efficiency, cooling, and sustainability. Join one of the many project work streams to help solve challenges and pioneer solutions or serve.
As a volunteer leader to help steer the community towards the industry's ever-increasing challenges. If you're seeking cutting-edge solutions, explore our marketplace or the library of specifications and other contributions, and embrace OCP solutions in your next endeavor, or make OCP specifications part of your next RFP.
Check out the latest solutions at an OCP Experience Center or partner with any of our OCP-recognized facilities or OCP solution providers. Contribute specifications, design files, reference architectures or software to help solve the industry's greatest challenges, building trust in you and your brand.
Connect at OCP events through attendance and sponsorship, and embrace OCP's inclusive open spirit because together we're stronger, faster, and better. Please welcome Chief Innovation Officer of the Open Compute Project, Cliff Corner.
Welcome, everyone. I can't express how honored I am to be here today in Taiwan.
With all of you representing the OCP Foundation. It was just over a year ago we began to discuss the idea of having an event here in Taiwan. And with the support of many people from the OCP community and local partners here that have been very
Very gracious. Here we are. We have a sold-out event. Sponsorships were sold out months ago, and there's just, I believe, a few walk-in tickets left for attendance. Most importantly, we have a
Great lineup of content for everyone over the next two days. The OCP recently celebrated its 14th anniversary. Collaborations enabled within our community are as strong as ever. This year's theme.
is all about taking ideas and realizing them in an impactful way. Within the OCP community, we believe ideas must be polished through collaborations that the OCP fosters. We must deliver impactful solutions for the industry.
That's our mantra. Now, of course, everyone wants to talk about AI, and I have to do so as well. So, when it comes to AI, we believe OCP is the premier organization for open systems concerning AI. If you're not aware, in the past,
Year, the OCP community has been hard at work driving towards standardizations, and it's a long road, we're a long way from where we want to be, on key problems to be solved for AI: power, cooling, interconnect, sustainability, just to name it.
A few. The community recently published a white paper outlining a blueprint on a shared pathway to get to a one-megawatt rack and very large-scale AI clusters. Along the way, we've had generous contributions.
From Meta with Catalina, NVIDIA on the GB200 NVL72, and we currently have Project Diablo running, a collaboration between Meta, Google, and Microsoft. While I have everyone here, and it's a great creative
I'm glad to see everybody here. Some news from the foundation I would like to share for Chiplets and the silicon industry. We just announced how our community is enabling silicon diversity for high-performance AI and HPC clusters with the release of.
A new universal die-to-die transaction and link layer specification that also covers UCIE. And OCP recently launched a new circuit, recently launched a new optical circuit switch project looking at integration.
Integrating this new technology in a seamless way into modern networks. I wanted to mention a few other activities that you're going to hear more about later this morning. So I'm not going to steal their thunder, but I'm just going to mention them so that you'll be looking for it. First of all,
from Broadcom, Scale Up Ethernet, which is a framework for scale-out networking to support AI workloads, and from Google, a project called Deshute, which is a coolant distribution unit, fifth generation, that they're bringing to the OS.
Open Compute Project. So let's talk a bit about APAC. APAC is an extremely vibrant community within the Foundation, and participation by the member companies in APAC has never been stronger. Partially, I believe it's
Because everyone's looking for the OCP community to help people understand how we are going to deploy all those data centers for AI. Currently, AIPAC is a significant portion of the OCP community, representing 30% of
Corporate members. That's a huge portion. In total, between OCP-ready facilities and experience centers in the region, there are 17. And if we look at last year's contributions to OCP, 20% of the contributions had an
APAC corporate member associated with them. The last number here I want to share on this slide, of the $190 plus billion dollars that's forecast to be spent on OCP recognized equipment by 2019, 36% of it
Is going to be purchased and deployed here in the APAC region, according to IDC. So, again, a very significant participant in our community, and we're very happy for that. Now, in return, the OCP plans to support APAC.
Through targeted application of our programs, we want to help the APAC community continue to grow and expand its data center industry. So, where are we going to focus? Because we realize there are four key pillars where we believe we could help. One, support.
For equipment vendors through the OCP experience centers, two, increased alliances with different APAC industry associations, increasing marketplace visibility for system integrators within APAC, and also.
Aiding the emerging APAC technology initiatives that we've seen take hold in the last couple of years, focusing on startups and some of the researchers that are focused on future technologies. Now, we haven't been
sitting on our heel or resting on our laurels, we've already been busy in terms of working with some of the associations within APAC. For example, in the last year, we expanded and deepened our work with the Ion Ship Taiwan Alliance and also the Cloud Computing and IoT Association.
Within Taiwan. We've also started discussions with NTT wanting to increase our services in Japan. And on a global scale of note, we have recently announced an increased work with our standardization.
Work with JEDEC looking at automation for design automation for chiplets and silicon with new design automation, new design kits for EDA automation tools. Coming back to
our experience center and marketplace programs. The momentum is definitely visible in our community. If we look at the programs and how they're being taken up by people in APAC, the vast majority of OCP solution providers are in APAC.
Visible on the marketplace. The first vendors for OCP Safe came from APAC. And near 40% of OCP data center-ready facilities and 28% of experience centers are here in APAC. Huge presence from APAC and
The different programs already, and we believe we can take that further. One thing that sometimes I hear people have confusion about, and I want to try to set the record straight: OCP events are very unique, they're not like other events. OCP events have one purpose.
Primary purpose. That is to showcase the work done in our projects and do that worldwide. It's not about all the innovations that could happen, great innovations that could happen in the world, it's about the work done in our community. So keep that in mind when you put in a speaking purpose.
Proposal to one of our events. Did the work happen in our community? Was it done collaboratively? And then you have a good chance that we'll pick it up and it'll be presented here. Following this event in Taipei, the OCP will hold three events in the remainder of 2025: OCP China Day.
OCP Korea Tech Day, and of course OCP Global Summit later this year. And I'm also very happy to let you know we already have a full year of events planned for 2026, including a return to Taiwan. So think about 2026.
Pay here next August. We'll be back. So, there's keynotes that are going to follow me. We have a full morning of keynotes, and I want to thank everyone for participating in the community who's here today. It's because of you that I can make that statement that we'll be back next year.
A lot of full seats that makes me feel really pleased. We will hear from industry pundits a little later this morning after I get off the stage, technology providers and hyperscale operators, and also silicon providers. So, a really good lineup of top-notch content for everyone to appreciate.
And so, with that, I do have one more thing that I've said a few times, and I want to repeat it one more time: how important APAC is as a part of the OCP community. Many of our staff are here today to serve you, and you can also meet the foundation staff if you can make it to one of our.
Our other events around the globe. If you need any assistance during this event, please feel free to reach out to any one of the folks that have a red square around their picture. We're all here on site to take care of you. So, with that, let me wish you a wonderful conference. Take care.
Please welcome DigiTimes Chairman and CEO, Kali Huang.
Good morning. Ladies and gentlemen, it's my great honor to have the opportunity to co-host the event with OCP. It is a great honor for me.
You know, after COVID-19, I went abroad almost every month. I pay visits to California, to London, South, Germany, Tokyo, many countries, many major cities all over the world.
Chairman, CEO from Intel, Samsung, many big companies. They all asked me how to build an expressway from London, Solar, Tokyo to Taipei. Because we have the best infrastructure, as you know. Last year, America.
Having imported 61.9 billion new servers from overseas, 67% from Mexico, 26% from Taiwan. But as you know, Mexico is also produced by Taiwanese makers.
China, they've been imported 11.8 billion US dollars as well, and also 40% from Taiwan, 20% from Vietnam, 16% from Malaysia. They all produced by Taiwanese makers as well. And as you know, KSMC contributes the most, more than 90% of the global.
AI related chips. There is a background of involvement of the infrastructure of Taiwan today. So today I try to give you some perspectives about the high industry from Taiwan. You know, last Friday, I met the chairman, Hai Tech Company.
They asked me a question about FoxCon trying to produce EVs and how Digital can help. I say, yes, today only two voices from the world about the EVs market. First one is Chinese makers, second one is a global.
Brands like a band, BMW, and the GM, Toyota, Toshiba, as well. But we need different voices from Supreme as well. There is a totally different approach. Where from the voice, then we need to consider. Then, you know, I pay visit Silicon Valley almost every month.
week uh sorry every quarter not every week it's too challenge for me but every quarter I've been there I found most of the people working in Silicon Valley they don't talk too much about who produce reg servers for Amazon Google Microsoft
They only focus on AI, big data, quantum, low Earth orbit. They don't talk too much about supply chain. Then we got the opportunities. So when Jensen Huang he mentioned AI is eating software, software is eating the world. But my perspective is could hardware also eat AI?
From Germany to America, from Indonesia to India, all of the countries try to attract multinational companies to invest in their country, but mostly they prefer manufacturers because they can share the wealth and opportunities from local.
Society. So we may need different approaches to think about the world. Okay, semiconductor looks like a technology-intensive and capital-intensive industry. That is true. But chemistry-wise, it's different than before. We developed the industry from wires to central.
Control. There's about big funds from China or today, even America. So we need to think about how to co-work with many different countries. And I always say Taiwan appearances just like a sweet potato. But as you know, we are sweet, very hot. So we need to think about operation.
So I try to understand the big shift from global strategies. First one, why the Trump administration had a new tariff system. So I think it's about local manufacturing. But maybe you didn't know, last year, only 10% of American GDP contributed by Manufacturers.
Manufacturing. But when Taiwan is about was about thirty eight percent. So American economy fully supported by demand side. Taiwan is fully supported by supply side. That is a difference. So we we cannot take the same way, but we need also need to think about we are harmless partner because we only
Sub-country to many countries, many companies. Eminum, Google, Microsoft, they all come to Taiwan trying to find partners. And uh why Trump adminis administration has a new standard? Because we need to think about the tech giants. What means for tech giants? Maybe Minnon, Google, Microsoft, Tech Star, Broadcom.
Many companies, but as I know, the top eight companies, the total market value today is about 20 trillion US dollars. So, if they all purchase servers or related chips from Taiwan, then we need to know how to help them because every company wants to monopolize the market.
Then they need different things. So we need a good perspective about brand value. Today, I don't think brand value is like 20 years ago. HPE, they off, they are branding companies. But what means for that today? If you produce servers, you buy servers.
Which company, what kind of company you want to co-work with them, but also semiconductor. We need to think about memory IC foundry, but we need a full picture. As you know, most of the Western media, Western society media, they always emphasize the market as big as 628 billion startups. That is the market size.
But maybe if you count the company from foundry or set, EDA2, equipment, materials, if you combine together, actually the industry revenue last year surpassed one trillion US dollars already. But I never heard Western-based media mention about that kind of things. They don't care about.
Supply side. But today, the fire side is more influential beyond your imagination. So, we need to think about opportunities from mobile telecom, consumer electronics, but also we need to think about smart manufacturing because we try to build more production sites. Can you believe? Only top eight.
Server companies of Taiwan today they have more than 120 manufacturing sites over the world. Do you know, Quinta, where they produce servers in America? Maybe you didn't know. Now I'm very happy to let you know: Tennessee, Memphis, for domestic market. Memphis.
Is a very important airframe hub for logistics and warehouse services. So we need to know that kind of things. And today, we cannot only think about globalization. We also need to think about globalization. So, in the coming maybe five years later,
We also need to think about the global market, not only America and China. We also need to help Europe, South Asian countries, and we also need to think about how Taiwan, Korea, and Japan interactive work together. Believe me, only Japan, Korea, Taiwan has a real native industry.
And we need to soul. We need to think for ourselves. We are different from Singapore. Most of the Singaporean companies are multination companies. They approach just like outside in. But our approach is inside out. We need to go abroad to work with many companies. And may I ask you a question?
Don't need to answer today, but if you are CEO of TSMC, if you want to go abroad, give you one choice: Middle East or India, which one you prefer. Can you think answer these questions? So I've been to those countries many, many.
times I knew what they want. Today most of the companies they focus on computing devices, high performance computing, like Google, Microsoft, not only Apple. So they they work with that kind of things. That t but if you know today in India they may have more than one hundred unicorns.
Then, if you go to India, don't just talk to Tata Reliance. You need to think about the unicorns, because they have software domestic market, and they need hardware solutions. So, we are different from America. We are different from Europe. But we need to co-work with American companies and high-tech companies co-workers.
Together to build the wealth and prosperity for the society globally. So, when tech giants developed a new business from AI-owned device, I believe they will work with Taiwan because timing, timing, timing is so important: edge computing. So, hardware software integration.
It's different from before. So don't talk too much about the brands. Now we need harder software integration. That's different from before. So here's the market. Can you believe? Beginning of this year, I found the data from I forgot where I get it from, but I as I said, I
known globally semiconductor industry market value as big as 8 trillion US dollars can you believe 71% from American based companies what means for American based Nvidia Intel TI Broadcom Qualcomm Mavel those companies yes
Totally, they contribute seventy-one percent. But do you know sorry do you know Taiwan is one point one eight trillion US dollars? We are fourteen point six percent of the world and we are equal to Japan.
Prost Korea, plus China, plus Europe. We have 14.6%. And actually, two weeks ago, I was in Tokyo. I had a good friend. He worked for the Japanese government and used to be the congressman. And he said, yes, I know you have TSMC. But my good friend, I said,
Do you know even we don't count TSMC? Our market value is equal to Japan. And we are on only one-fifth population and the GDP scale of Japan. But why we have five times the new? Do you believe, do you know that? Taiwan IC design industry scale is ten times of Korea.
But Korea has 2.1 times of population of Taiwan. So we are different. And which country is number three in the world? Yes, I went to Netherlands. I met Vice Minister of Netherland government. I say, you are the number three significant country in the world because SML.
NXP, but believe me, I pay a visit to XML and NXP. They're only five kilometers distance. They all spin off from Phillips. And the campus are different, not like Taiwan. You know, last Friday I was in Shinsu, had lunch. I made some
friends in the same restaurant. It doesn't matter, they come from Media Tech or Real Tech or TSMC. We all sit together and we can chat and we can talk. We know each other well because our disadvantage is geographic is too small. My advantage is high population density. It's good for us to communicate.
So here, you know, if you're a company like branding company, HP Dell, Apple, you may try to build more community, bigger community, and then you provide car services. You you come to Taiwan just only one reason, cost, not on any other reason, but we are lucky. Once you subcontract to Taiwan, bigger and bigger.
And Taiwan gets better infrastructure than anyone else in the world. We are the best. I knew that. I traveled to more than 1,000 companies. I pay a visit to more than 1,000 companies, maybe 1,500 about. So I knew, and we are lucky because we have TSMC, which is the hit.
Value of Fungi. And now, most of the big giants they try to monopolize the market and they need to reshape their brands. They need the ecosystem and the quick response only from Taiwan. So there is a reason why we saw success. And believe me,
In the coming 10 years, I believe Taiwan is going to have a golden age, 10 years at least. And actually, five years ago, I mentioned this comment. But now I still say 10 years longer. So we are lucky. We believe. I believe we still have many challenges facing from.
Semiconductor industry, but I always talk to my friends this year only three key words: AI, semiconductor, and Mr. Trump. So we need to think about their policies. And we are small potatoes. Yes, as I say, Taiwan is a hundred partners. We always help other companies, hunt other countries.
Even India, even Malaysia, Thailand, Japan, even Korea, if they invite me as an advisor, I will share with them about Taiwan experience. More Taiwan experience, more success. I believe there is a good way from the button-up approach we have today. So, supply chain migration, it doesn't matter.
Going to Vietnam, Malaysia, or TSMC to Germany, America, even Japan. So I believe we need more resources, but we need to build and help other countries to build the infrastructure for themselves. Then, sovereignty of the industry will be very, very important. It's good for.
For global society, not only good for Taiwan. But the Taiwan experience is very different, very, very different. So, branding value, then we need to think about late supply chain. And people talking about mature technology, semiconductor, many things about China, EV is about China. But we also need to think about memory, how to work with.
SK Heiny, Samsung, and the Chinese company, farm geek strategies, many things advanced, test impaction, tariff, exchange rate, and CAPEC and cash flow will be very important. Believe me. Taiwan, TSMC, FastCom, they all invest their all net profit into CAPEC.
Almost 100%. That is a big deal. And yes, OCP, my friends from overseas, please come to Taiwan more often, share opportunities from Taiwan. And we also like to help other countries make the industry more successful. Thank you for your attention. Thank you very much. Thank you.
Please welcome Meta Distinguished Software Engineer Jasmee Baga.
Hello, good morning. So over the next few days, you will hear a lot about AI. This word will be repeated over and over again. At Meta, we are deeply involved in this space. What I'm going to talk to you about is what we are doing to build this large-scale AI.
Infrastructure to support all of our AI codes. So from 2020 onwards, we have slowly seen AI creep up into our lives. Personally, in my day-to-day work, it ranges from sending goofy memes over WhatsApp asking AI, you know, to compose something.
I go and ask AI, often our AI tools, to ask, to write unit tests for a module. I'm increasingly surprised on how many edge cases it finds. So this is getting better and better, and there is no
There is no turning around. This is truly a transformative technology of our times. However, if you look at meta, AI is actually not new to us. It was, if you go back to our product news feed in 2006, it was based on recommendation engines. Recommendation engines use machine learning. So we were in.
Only as far back as 2006, we were already using AI to build our products and release them to the world. However, from 2006 to 2025, there is a huge change. From 2020 onwards, AI started getting into many more products. So now AI is not restricted to one product.
One application, one tool, but everything, everything we release, be it WhatsApp, be it Instagram, be it meta glasses, or be it internal tools, AI is everywhere. It's an AI-first approach. There has been a corresponding growth in the cluster.
Sizes as well. So AI takes a lot of intra. AI is infra-hungry. You will see this picture a lot. So from 2020 onwards, when we started slowly building clusters, there was really an exponential growth up. However, the key part, this is a known fact. Everybody knows this. However, the key fact here is we don't see this growth.
Growth slowing. We see this growth, exponential growth continuing at least up to 23 onwards, 2030, at least up to 2030, and who knows what beyond that. And this is not just an empty projection. Later in the presentation, you will see large, and the largest infrastructure bets we are making at MERA.
to support this uh support this growth. Here is another way of looking at the same thing. Back in 2022, we were building clusters that were of 128 GPU or 512 GPU, half a k GPU, which seems actually tiny today.
This was, we thought, sufficient for our needs, and actually it was at that time. But this is moving at warp speed. Go to 2023, suddenly we started getting demands to build clusters of sizes 16K. That is 16K GPUs talking to each other over a single job.
This meant our cluster sizes had to be bigger. So we built cluster sizes of 16K to 24K. We thought this was a humongous achievement. It was built in an ear, many X the scale. We were wrong. Then comes Gen AI. Now suddenly we got a lot of a lot of the same thing.
Demand to build 100k-wide clusters. And we have released this to the public. We actually build out 100k clusters and actually are running jobs which are involving 100k GPUs at the same time. Think about it: 100k GPUs all running long-running jobs over a network, over an infra that is stable.
enough for running these multi-multi-R jobs over and over again. This is already a reality for us. So you might ask, where is this headed? Is it just about Meta's products? It is just about making Meta's tools better.
Mark laid out our vision for this. In a public post, he described that we are aiming for super intelligence. Super intelligence not just for Meta's employees, Meta's products, but for everybody in the society. What that means is, think of superintelligence as an intelligent agent available to everybody to do the things.
That you want. This could be very different for different people. So, for a creator, it might make funny images, making images, making some text, generating text for their work. For a coder, it might mean generating some code. The idea here is that this intelligence is available to you.
To augment what you do. So you can do higher things. You it's it's not a replacement, it's an augmentation. All of this requires very large, large-scale infra, larger than even we have built ever before.
So right now as we speak, we are building a one gigawatt cluster called Prometheus, which is going to support many of these hundreds of thousands of GPUs. This comes fully online in 2026. However, parts of it are already online. Later in the talk, I will show you some of the technologies that we're using to power Prometheus.
And this is on the near horizon. 2026 is not far away. However, Prometheus was a design which we built together. So there were lots of existing designs for data centers, a lot of existing designs for our technologies. We built a bunch of adjacent data centers and adjacent facilities and connected.
them together to build this one gigawatt cluster. So this was in a way our reaction to building and supporting these 100 K GPU clusters or many hundreds of K GPU clusters. Hyperion is 5x the scale. Hyperion is a clean slate design that we plan to come up uh plan to bring it online in the next few years.
This is five gigawatts. This is going to be in Luziana already committed product. So look at the graph that I showed you before. This is our commitment to building ever larger scale infra towards this expected demand of AI. The technologies that will be used there, the designs that will be used there are being
Being actively discussed and debated. We are deeply involved in researching this subject, and all of the technologies we don't even know what will go to building this. So, now coming back, we see AI as standing on four pillars: compute, network, data.
And software. In the next few slides, I'm going to zoom in the network part. So we talked about the large, large clusters, you know, one gigawatt, five gigawatt, hundreds of thousands of GPUs. We see a similar revolution happening in the smaller scale-up domains as well.
Today we see less than 100 accelerators strung together by, you know, connected together by technology such as our good old Ethernet to proprietary technologies like NBSO. However, we see this space getting much denser. The technology space is wide open, there is Ethernet.
There is proprietary technologies like NBSO, and there is UA Link. We are very actively participating in this space, very interested in this space, and plan to work with the community to develop this space. So the revolution should be looked at both ends, at the scale out and at the scale up. Both are very important.
For this, from the form factor side, we are already committing to this ORW rack, which is our wide rack, which we are starting to deploy and productionize in our data center. This we think serves very well for our power and cooling needs.
For the wide scale-up domains and will serve us in the years to come. We feel this is a right fit for our data centers. We encourage you to try it as well and evaluate it as well. This is something we are going for for our future scale-up domains. From scale-up,
We come to scale out. Last year at OCP in 2024, we announced DSF, a product which we use for supporting our AI clusters. DSF provides three key functionalities: perfect load balancing, because packets are split into cells and sprayed
Over all the available links. Scheduled fabric, meaning traffic is scheduled end-to-end. So you don't get congestion in the fabric, you don't get bursts at the end point, there is a steady delivery of traffic to the other endpoint. And very low requirements on the NIC and GPU.
NICs no longer have to handle out-of-order packets, NICs no longer have to handle very busty traffic because it's scheduled delivery. We felt this was a right fit for a many generation of GPUs and NICs that we were deploying. From 2024 onwards, we have now deployed this product in wide scale all over Meta.
Supporting many generations of GPUs, many generations of NICs, and this continues to go out as a cookie-cutter design, building our clusters. However, scale demands never stop. So from 24 onwards to 25, we actually got a requirement to scale this forward.
At least 4x. What we have done is taken this DSF technology and built another layer on top of it. So now we have a cluster of DSF based on DSF technology which is two-stage, which is now capable of supporting 18K GPUs in a single non-block.
domain, retaining all the properties of perfect load balancing, schedule fabric, and low demand on the NICs. This is this is the technology that is progressing Prometheus. This is this is the one that I told you about is already being deployed. Parts of this cluster are already online.
Here is a logical view of how DSF supports an 18K cluster with an 800 gig GPU. There is a two-plane design where 400 gig of this GPU goes to one plane, 400 gig of that same GPU goes to another plane.
And if you do the math for the topology here, there are four such domains and then one edge domain. This comes out to be 18K GPUs connected together. Now, 18K GPUs then are connected over an IP backbone that spans all these clusters and connects multiple.
of these 18K together, and you can keep scaling this out. This is what is promoting Prometheus. This is connected to build many hundreds of Ks of GPUs together. This is just a tip of the iceberg. For greater details, we have a detailed talk at 140 today. I encourage you to come and see what we have done with this technology.
Finally, what is our philosophy with AI? Meta has been a foundational partner of OCP. Being at OCP means being open. And we don't see this changing with AI. This is illustrated by us open sourcing our
core pieces like PyTorch or Lama, which are our which is our models. Two are physical infrastructure designs. Two are switching uh silicon designs, so our switching uh to the switches that we build. Two are switching software called FBoss, which is available in open source for anybody to build.
On top of. We don't see this changing in AI as well. We look forward to building this with the community, open sourcing and contributing back to the community. Finally, I'll leave you with this thought: this picture of Hyperion. We really think this journey has just begun.
There are lots of exciting times ahead. We are only 1% done. Thank you. Please welcome TSMC's Director of High Performance Packaging Integration Division, Dr.
Chung Yon Ho.
Thank you. Good morning, everyone. Uh I'm Nisha Yong Ho. It's my honor to give the keynote here in the summa summit about advanced c uh co-package optics uh integrated
By co-authors. I will start by introducing the rationale for heterogeneous triplet integration. Then I will explain the CPO as an A plus B type of integration.
innovation, where A is a compute module such as COW and B is photonic engine such as COOP. Although it sounds simple, the technology is very complex actually.
CPO with COAS and COP will open a newer era for HBC and AI. We use this page to illustrate how heterogeneous integration helps to
The system performance. The lower curve represents the efforts made by Moore's law. Today, around 100 billion transistors can be integrated on a chip, 800 million.
Meters square. The upper curve shows the system performance boost in terms of total transistor count that can be achieved by 2.5D and 3D integration. As I will
Explained later, CPO is considered a new dimension of system performance boost. COAS is the main 2.5D integration platform for AIHPC. There are three.
Flavors of Coas. Coas S is a silicon interposer in a large monolithic piece of silicon with interconnected and TSV. And COAS R is an organic interposer.
and CoSAL is a composite interposer. It's worth noting that uh CoSAL uh has a LSI interposer which can um extend the hi hygiene
Heterogeneous um chip integration from the top die level to the interposer layer itself. The unique advantages make CoASL the most powerful CoAS flavor in terms of overall system performance.
Performance. This page consolidated COA's past history as well as future roadmap. In the past 14 years since 2011, the technology has
Has gone through several periods of transition. First is HBM development, which started to get ready in 2016. Then the CoASL,
we uh CoSS we reached the maximum interposer size in twenty twenty. Then uh in two twenty twenty four we fin finished the development of CoSL and now is the first stage.
All the interposer size feature and thermal performance are being pushed at a very high speed. Know that this X scale is actually not linear and we
If it's linear, we'll see a higher slope, higher slope in recent years. There are only four dice that can be put on a 12-inch wafer for a 9.5.
vertical size interposer, which is the right-hand side. We have to develop an alternative solution other than wafer, that is panel-based co-ops, copus, and also
System on wafer SOW. We have been working on silicon photonics integration for quite a few years. We came up with this unique EIC on PIC 3D stack called
Compact and use universal photonic engine or coupe by leveraging SOIC technology. The same structure is compatible with major coupling geometry of grating coupler GC.
and edge coupler EC. While the COP waiver is available for both GC and EC, we prioritize the CPO development on GC because it has better supply chain readiness.
Than EC. Now we take a closer look at the cube structure. There are optical features added in addition to the SOIC. It's worth noting that.
That silicon handle of the SOI wafer of the PIC is completely removed in the coup process. Therefore, the backside C4 layer is connected to SOIC stack through TTV, which does not have the high frequency.
Loss as TSV. The vertical optical pass of the coop GC is the key to achieve low loss in GC. First, there is a backside metal reflector under GC thanks to the silicon handle removal. There are
Silicon lens on top of the permanent silicon carrier to column the beam before reaching the optical fiber. Finally, anti-reflect coating layers are designed along the optical path to minimize the optical loss.
After a careful optical simulation process uh optimization, we are able to achieve a net zero in insertion loss increase from PIC to COOP. This is very good achievement given that
The laser lid needs to travel through the support silicon more than 700 microns thick in Coupe. The 1 D G C insertion loss remains 1.2 dB from PIC all the way to Coupe. Peak wavelengths.
Is within 1.7 nanometer. 1 dB bandwidth is around 25 nanometer. COB enables silicon photonics optical engine and high bandwidth. It can be a very good body.
be used for pluggable as well as for CPO. Both OE on Subtray and OE on Interposer are considered CPO. We'll enter production for OE on Subtray next year.
And we are work also working on OEN on interposer. The power efficiency of CPO with OEN subtree and OER interposer are estimated about five and two picajoules per bit.
Much lower than that of 10 picojoules per bit for pluggable solutions. The bandwidth growth of silicon photonics optical I/O will be preceded in three dimensions. First is a speeding
Improvement in the PIC and EIC, and to carry more wave lengths in one optical I/O. Second one is through packaging structure migration, basically to shorten the distance between co-ops, compute.
Module and coop. Third, the number of fiber fiber should add the shangwing. Sorry.
How to get away from
As mentioned above, COAS and COOP will be integrated together in one package to empower the performance scroll of AI and HPC systems. CoAS will be developed in bigger sizes to accommodate more transistors.
3D stack die types and more LSI flavors in the reconstitute interposer. The optical IO may be made by Coop, will be developed for higher bandwidth, lower energy per bit, and lower latency.
I will conclude my talk here. I already mentioned the first three bullets in previous speech. The thing I like to emphasize is that the first thing is that I'm going to
Is the last one. Long-term CPO roadmap advancement calls for the need for supply chain innovation and collaboration. For example, CP and FT test of CPO, FAU innovation, optical assembly.
with high throughput and yield, all need to be carefully addressed. Thank you very much for your attention.
Please welcome ASE's Executive Vice President, Yin Chang.
Good morning. First I want to thank Open Compute Platform for the kind invitation to AAC to share a brief vision of us doing advanced packaging during this very interesting era of AI.
AI is here. We all know that AI is in every part of our life, from healthcare to communication to e-commerce and financial services. For what it was, AI economy for something less than $200 billion just a few years ago.
Is projected to exceed almost $5 trillion by 2033, a 25-fold increase in such a short amount of time. And with this AI explosion, the data growth is also growing exponentially to almost 200 gigabytes. And this will propel.
Global GDP to maintain a 15% growth from today to 2030. And this is the importance of AI to us. There are multiple AI models, as you probably already aware, and previous presenters have shared. There is multimodal AI. This is
The generative AI that can be put into probably a robotic system quite soon. So we are probably going to do five senses of human from audio to visual to possibly taste, smell, and touch. And then the most recent thing about
Genet AI, which the proactive AI is going to be upon us that can reason, learn, and act on our behalf based on our performances, preferences, and desires. And all this AI require compute. Tremendous amount of compute power. And this is a challenge.
That semiconductor industry faces. The performance of increasing at 2 to 7x every year, require much more memory bandwidth, and require 2x to 10x of network bandwidth, just on memory alone. So, to put more memory, to put more SOC, we need to increase the
Area size of our modules from today or three radical size could be as big as 10 radical size in 2027. So, how do we drive all these silicon? We need now to consider power. How do you reduce power losses? How do you increase power efficiencies? And with this much power,
power, thermal becomes the next challenge for us to reduce the thermal requirement for every AI system. So this kind of shows very simply, the left chart shows how various models increasing the data set by almost 4x every year.
Require the compute to grow as fast. But how do we do that in today's semiconductor challenges? And this is one of the challenges for us. Next is memory. So to feed all the SOCs and all the chiplets, we need the memory to grow with it. But it's CC very
Clearly in the chart, the black line is where the compute is growing, accelerating, and the green line is where the HVM is. There is a gap. So we are now ending up putting more memory per chiplet or per SOC architecture. And this grows the area of the module.
So you kind of see the HPC HVM roadmap where if you look at AMD, the latest NVIDIA, Blackwell, or Rubin, by 2027, they'll grow the number of HVM from today's 8 HVM per modules to 16 HVM per modules in HVM4.
And this is what driving the challenges for us as an assembly company to create larger, larger area and create more efficiency and utilization for every interposer that we use. So if you look at where the key challenges for large-sized modules, today we're
Running basically 10,000 square millimeter of module, 100 by 100 millimeter modules. And that continued to grow. And that's already a 5x reticle size. And we plan to see from some of the customers as much as 10 reticle size in the very near future. And this is all the challenges.
With regarding warpage, regarding utilization of the panels, yields get reduced as the panel gets bigger, and these are the challenges that we face. But to deliver the power to drive all these large modules with 16 HVMs and 11 chiplets, the power of the power is the power of the
Delivery challenges is no longer just afterthought. It is a number one thing for us to try to figure out to improve the power efficiency and to reduce the power loss as the current increases. Now, if we look at thermal requirements, this chart kind of quickly.
Identify the challenge that we see. If you look at the red and green chart where the CPU and GPU current will be driving, by 2030, GPU will be running at 1500 watts, and CPU will be doing 500 watts. But to run,
These types of power, the temperature for the devices actually need to be lower, need to be around 30 degrees C. Compared today, air cool, you might have to run at 50, 60 degrees C. So, this is another thermal challenge for us as part of the overall semiconductor supply chain.
How do we solve such problems? So, this is the innovation ecosystem that AAC strive to share with the open compute platform through new materials, possibly new development, and new equipment. And those are all leveraging our heterogeneous solutions that help us with co-op
Package optic that allows us to do less and less power or more efficiently. So, our goal is actually always to do more than more. If you heard earlier, the power of compute requires 4x per year. It's significantly faster growth than what Morrisaw has shared with us.
Does in the past 20 years. So we're pushing a limit of architecture, semiconductor, packaging solution. And all this thing has to be done with a lower cost or at no cost increase. And this requires more new efficiencies. So what does AAC would like to do?
DAC want to leverage the VIPAC that we introduced back in late 2022. It's a vertical integrated package that we started out with Focus, a fan out package with chip-blast, chip-first solution. Now we're doing full production on Focus Bridge with Silicon Bridge solution, and then we're going on to
Two and a half to three D ICs, not to mention also cold package optic. So, all these are typically tools that allow silicon architect, AI architect, data center architect to create the new innovation breakthrough that allow us to reach those compute power that we all seek to have.
So, first is talk about focus. Focus is basically allow us to do organic RDL on top of glass carriers that connect chiplets, possibly using HVN together. But with the HVN bandwidth requirements, we're now putting a silicon bridge. The silicon bridge interpoles
Are sitting most likely between an HVM3 or HVM4 and a chiplet solution and running a C4 bump less than 130 microns. So we talked about earlier the size of the module is very, very important. So at five,
Reticle size, there's only seven module per 300 millimeter wafers. And that's only 57% utilization. So AAC is looking at larger panel sizes, 300 millimeter panel, and 600 millimeter panels. And that allows us to use up to 87% utilization for a 5x ranch.
So this is an example of that. This is a ten die with ten silicon bridges onto a panel format. So it is ten eight compute die with two IO silicon that are connected by ten bridge dies.
So, it kind of shows you what is possible when we put the different technology together to create even bigger, bigger modules. So, we can go up to 10x radical size in one day. So, but regarding power, we introduced a concept of power sip last.
Last year. Basically, it's putting first and second dage voltage regulator directly underneath the module itself to reduce the power travel path, to allow us to increase the overall power efficiency and deliver the power where it's needed the most.
So just doing electron may not be enough. So we talk about putting chiplet together, putting HVM together, but we do need more help. The previous speaker, Dr. Hu that talked about silicon photonics and AAC share the same vision.
That we believe that with chipless solution and CPO, you can produce a next-generation data center with the highest bandwidth, highest compute power possible. And we are providing tools for us to do that for customers, such as many.
Of you in this room, we're trying to create an easier way to do edge coupling, putting laser dire integration, and doing 3D IC integration through fan out between EIC and PIC. And this creates a photonic engine right next to the package or right next to the CPU.
or GPU triplets. So we kind of talk about briefly about the challenges that we face and we kind of talk about now the solution to increase the compute power and meet the 2 to 7x performance require and the memory 2 to 2.
10x require and the larger area that we need to put more and more HVM and chiplet. We're using the chiplet integration, a heterogeneous integration, by leveraging the focus solution that we talked about earlier, whether it's chip last or chip first, putting bridge, silicon bridge between the die to become focused.
Bridge, doing silicon photonics to reduce the power and increase bandwidth, and to do panels as large as 600 by 600 millimeter panel to get the maximum utilization so we can get to that large module that we seek to meet the compute power demand of the future. And as far as eco.
Systems concern, we are now putting power SIP with VRM, RMIVR integration, backside power behind the silicon structure, and CPO to reduce the overall power by converting electrons to photons. And thermal is also something that we are actively.
Be working on to discover new material in terms of TIM materials and possibly even working with silicon vendor or microchannel cooling. And this kind of gives you an example of what is actually done at AAC today.
In summary, we know AI and data continue to grow. This is what fuels semiconductor growth, and how we believe by 2030, semiconductor will be a $1 trillion industry. And this is what shapes our life today. And I think collectively, what AAC would like to do is share as much tools
Inability to the audience for that creative solution, that innovation breakthrough that propels us to the next generation of AI innovation. Thank you so much. Please welcome.
AMD's Corporate Vice President, Architecture and Strategy, Robert Ormuth. Okay. Good morning, OCP. How are we doing? Everybody having a good day so far? So I'm going to
Take you on a little journey of OCP and AMD and how it really aligns with our strategy. But first, like everybody else, I've got to talk a little bit about AI first. And if you've been in the industry long enough, like I have, you've seen all these technology waves starting back from the
Mainframe, all the way up through the cloud, all the way up to where we are with Gen AI. And I hate to say that I think I've been involved in every one of these waves, a little bit on the mainframe, not that much. So I'm old, but not that old. But on the Gen AI front, you know, it's really this most disruptive.
Technology, I truly believe that we've ever seen. And that's because of profound impact to humans. You know, today we're down somewhere in the human QA productivity. We're early, honestly. You know, we're heading towards autonomous robots, true human assistance to help humans live better lives.
Was actually joined. There's a picture of me on the stage at Dell Tech World where I was joined on stage by a little humanoid robot. Luckily, he was only four foot tall, not Arnold Schwarzenegger, the Terminator kind of android. But I truly believe that's where we're heading in the future here. And the market is.
Is huge and growing. You know, the 60% CAGR or so overall, inference is starting to really take off as businesses figure out how to make money with AI. I mean, that's at the end of the day, all the training's great, but businesses are going to adopt to translate it into profit.
But AI is creating a lot of architectural challenges for us. We came from a world where we had general-purpose computing, we had FP64 and scientific computing for HPC, and the world of AI is forcing us to think differently because we're having to trade off accuracy for speed. AI is about speed.
Invented a lot of new math formats, FP4, FP6. But even within the world of AI, it's pulling itself apart too. When you look inside the unique requirements for the cloud versus edge or embedded or endpoints, it's pulling us apart. And so we're going to have to optimize the architecture at the silicon.
Level and at the platform level, we're going to have to optimize differently for those different use cases. And so it's a really exciting time. But at the same time, there's a lot of, you know, you've heard a lot of talk this morning about a five gigawatt data center, and there's a lot of impact happening that impacts us all. You know, at the end of
Structure level. The chip power is going through the roof, the rack power is going equally high, the data center power is going 10x, the networking bandwidth. And it's kind of interesting: the first two, chip power and rack power, the predominant driver on that is because of the ROI of drive-in density and try and stay in copper.
just as long as we can. The reason we're making bigger and bigger chips and putting them denser and denser in the rack is to keep in copper just as long as we can. We will get to optics someday, but it's going to be a little ways out. And so we have all these implications of trying to drive perf per watt, performance.
Making it easy, make it easy to cool, easy to adopt, driving the pace of innovation. And one of the themes that comes through all of this is one of the best ways to address all of this is through open collaboration in the industry. And so, as part of AMD's strategy, if you look at AMD's kind of top-level strategy,
It's about solving the world's biggest challenges to drive human innovation with high-performance products. And part of in our AI strategy, again, it's about those leadership compute engines, getting to full reference stack architectures, and then it's about the open ecosystem that is really
What AMD is involved in. And so we are a true believer in open, driving open hardware, open software, open ecosystems. We're involved in, very involved in OCP, but the alignment of the OCP mission in AMD is fundamentally, the goal is just fundamentally aligned. We truly believe that open.
Standard promoting open collaboration drives everybody forward. And so, what I wanted to go through is just kind of highlight the areas where A and B has been very focused over the last couple years. And the reason we've been focused on this is because that open innovation drives choice, it drives rapid innovation.
Innovation, quality, basically friction reduction to adopt technology. And so we've been involved in OCP from the start of DCMHS. Again, our goal there was to reduce friction to adoption. How do we get our chips into boards, into OEMs, into end users faster?
Faster. How do we make them higher quality? Getting people collaborating on the same design. So we've moved all of our reference designs, if you haven't heard or seen, we moved all of our reference designs, our customer reference boards are all now DCMHS. Starting with our Turn platform, and then our new Venice platform that comes out next year is all in.
Different form factors of DCMHS. So, we fundamentally believe that this has really helped AMD drive adoption. And we're somewhere north of 40% server share now. And a lot of that is because we're able to drive, reduce that friction to adoption. So, very motivated in all the different elements of DCMHS.
We're also very involved in the RAS standpoint, because one thing that we've learned from all our MDC customers is law of large numbers, you will have failures. And so we've been really involved in OCP and driving in some of the hardware fault management sub-projects because we believe fundamentally that
This benefits us, the silicon providers, platform providers, and end users to increase quality. And so, having commonality on the RAS APIs: how do you manage the RAS on a GPU? How do you do RAS debug on the GPU? Or fleet management, fault management, these are all projects that we're very involved in.
Anticipation that we would love to see more participation in the community. On the security front, we were really at the forefront of Calyptra. This was basically a hardware root of trust, open source, RISC-V kind of implementation to basically how do you verify your silicon is your silicon?
Running your firmware. And that's what California was really about. And we will be intercepting that in some of our products in 26. And then we've been involved in SAFE, which is basically how do you have an outside audit? How do you audit? And if you're going to say something secure, you have to have somebody else come check it out. That's what the SAFE program is.
Program is about. And then you have the OCP attestation, which is about kind of the system-wide. How do I know everything that's in that system is the right chip, the right firmware, the right software level, it's been audited, and I know it's a completely secure system. So these are, you know, on the security front, some of the major programs that we have been driving.
Inside of AMD with the OCP community. But we haven't stopped there. There's a lot more to go. You know, management and debug. Again, law of large numbers. How do you debug a million servers in a fleet? You're going to have failures that you wouldn't have seen in a 100-unit deployment, or you would have just chalked up to a
You know, an OS crash, but you're going to have fleet management issues. So, how do we get that? How do you update 100,000 GPUs firmware in a consistent way? How do you manage those GPUs consistently? So, there's work streams in OCP where we're standardizing those APIs to make it very easy.
On the CPU front, there's an impactless firmware update. How do you update firmware on a CPU without forcing an OS reboot or a CPU reboot? So we're working through all those details. And now we have liquid cooling come along. We're going to have to manage the CDUs and the cracks and everything that goes in there.
To manage, and we need to do it in a standard way. And we're pulling in infrastructure that historically has not been very modernized. When you look at some of the infrastructure and data centers around cracks and CDUs and PDUs, I mean, some of them have CAN buses on them still, they don't even have Ethernet. So, we're going to have to pull them into the whole ecosystem for management.
And then power and cooling. Again, we're very active here. Getting unification on the BlindMake Quick Connect. I think we're making great progress in OCP and getting the two prevailing kind of initiatives unified to one with the UQD V2. We hosted a workshop in.
In Austin, earlier this year, where we got everybody together with the notion of harmonizing this together. We're working right now inside of OCP as well on how do we make sure that we have some standardization or some commonization on the fluid types. The fluid type does
matter and we want to make sure that we recommend to our customers what's the right one to use so that they have success. But beyond OCP, there's other things going on. You know, we recognized a couple years ago that the network really mattered a lot, especially the scale out and the scale up.
So we started, we got together with a bunch of friends and started Ultra Ethernet to really address that scale-out networking. And happy to say that the 1.0 was released a couple months ago. And then, likewise, on the GPU scale up front, the industry
Leaders got together and said, Hey, we need an open-choice, high-performant interconnect for scale up. And so the industry got together and we formed Ultra Accelerator Link. In fact, AMD donated a bunch of most of the IP, a lot of the first wave IP came from our Infiniti fabric. So I want to do a quick test since you're kind of been
Care board for a minute. How many of you are involved in or your companies involved in UEC? Raise your right hand. Companies involved in UEC? How about UAL? We have some with two hands? Good, good. So, the important thing about that to me is really the quote on the bottom.
You know, competition is the law of the jungle. You know, cooperation is the law of civilization. So we have to advance together. And so we formed UAL and UEC, fundamentally different technologies, right? Ultra Accelerator Link is all about the load store world. How do we stay natively in the same language?
That an HPM and a GPU talk. It talks native load store address data command. You know, the ultra-Ethernet talks packets. It was invented to have computer-computer communication with frames. Perfectly great technologies, but optimized fundamentally differently for different worlds: the packet world versus the load.
To our world. You know, if you look at the goal of UAL, it's how do I get as much HPM connected across the network as fast as possible with the lowest latency, lowest power, lowest cost. Ultra Ethernet, millions and millions of nodes. We're never going to do millions of nodes with UAL. But there is a big difference that the cost.
Power, silicon area, and latency level between the two, because they're really optimized for two different worlds. And so, in our view, it's about any CPU, any accelerator, any NIC, any switch. We want choice competition to drive us forward in the world of AI, in the era of AI. And so, in the last part.
I want to just tease up a topic. Many of you have been involved. You've seen these form factors. The industry's done a great job on PCI Chem and OCP, the UBB OAM. AMD's current product family instinct is shipping in the UBBOAM as shown on the top right. And we've pushed the envelope on them.
A lot. We've pushed the power, we've pushed the signal integrity, we've added liquid cooling to them, we've made them double-wide, we've added extra connectors for power, done everything we can. But we're starting to run out of steam, I would say. And so there's a big question that I have in my head at AMD.
As part of driving our long-term strategy at AMB, is where do we go next? And so I got the great idea to come into this before this conference to say, well, I'm gonna feed all this into Grok and describe the problem to Grok and say, you know, we've been doing PCI Chem, we pushed the power, we did OAM, we pushed the power, we've got this scale up.
Scale-out fabric now that we need to blend into it. We need commonality, multi-vendor. And so I asked Grock, you know, what would you do? And it actually gave me an answer, surprisingly. And it actually came out and drew me a picture like this. And it said, hey, go modify the chem card.
You know, change the shape size of the chem card, make the connector bigger, go put UAL and U and put UAL and PCIe on it, put a blind mate, you know, quick connect for power and for, or a blind mate for power and for liquid cooling, and run Ultra Ethernet out the front.
Like, hey, that's really cool. That's a great idea. So, I want to introduce it to my friends. I don't know if this is the right idea or not, but I wanted to put it out there as a: we have to start thinking differently before what we do next. This is not an official project, we're not officially doing it. This was a you know, kind of a, you.
Know maybe I massaged it to this answer, I don't know, but you know how AI works. But it was interesting that it took all the input and said this is what it recommends. So, not that I always trust AI, but it's a nice something to start with to think about. And so, really, I wanted to just tell everybody here to think about it. And so, my call to action.
From AMD, you know, we really believe time and time again open is the winning bet. You know, it aligns with our AMD goals and strategy around development, scaling innovation through collaboration. We're involved in a lot of projects at OCP. A couple years ago, we weren't.
And so I really want to encourage you to join us in those projects because choice, flexibility, that rapid co-innovation, the portability, proven quality, all comes out of that joint collaboration. And there are other things outside of OCP that I encourage you to participate in, especially with the ultra-accelerator link and ultra-ethernet.
They're making good headways. The first ultra Ethernet products are starting to ship in the market now. The first UAL products will come out next year. So, you know, join us there. And just a reminder for us all: while competition, we are in many ways, many of us are competing with one another. It is the
Law of the jungle, but we're civilized human beings, so we need to collaborate to advance. So, thank you for the time and enjoy OCP Taipei. Thank you. Please welcome NTT's Head of ION Development Office, Dr. Yosuke.
Aragane. Okay. Thank you. So today I'd like to explain about the IOM, a little bit about optical and worse networks.
So, as the previous speaker said, today that we know recognize the importance of the optics for the barely short distance, the communication, for the both the not only the communication, but also the computing side. So, but the
In the year of 2019, where we started the ion initiatives. At that time, the people said, often said, the optics for short distance? No, we already have the copper wire. It's enough. But now the sanctuary.
The technology improvement. Yeah, we all of us know that the optics is very important to utilize everywhere in the IT field. That's what the IOM aims for. We would like to pursue both the high performance
Like the high capacity or higher quality, and also that the lower latency, and as well as the sustainability issues of the lower consumption. As you know, the previous speaker said, we know the
that current hyperscale data set consumes a lot of the energies, electricities. So we cannot ignore that. So that we should solve, or we should pursue both the growth of the economic and as well as sustainability.
So that we are focusing on, well, we are very interested in to utilize the optics for that year objectives, that year ion innovative optical and wire network. Of course, it is a very important and also that challenging target. So that not only that.
one company, not only the one industry, it is impossible to do that. In other words, it's essential for us to collaborate with diverse companies and also the diverse industries not only to develop the technologies.
But also implement it to the real world, real market. It's very important for the human beings, the growth of the economy. So that's why we established ION Global Forum.
For my introduction, I manage the belong to the NTT Japanese telecom company, but also that I'm one of the leaders of the IOM Global Forum. I have two hearts. Today, I take the heart of the Ion Global Forum to introduce how.
And why I am Global Forum collaborates to do or pursue the such objectives. So, since it starts or established in the year of 2020, we welcome a lot of the companies, members.
From the diverse legions and the diverse industries. One important thing, or one important characteristic of the IM Global Forum, I should say, is that we tackle with not only technology, but also
The use cases. That's why ION Google Professor welcomed not only from the IT industries or the IT manufacturer industries, but also the companies who would like to utilize ION technology.
For their businesses. In other words, their user company. So that collaborating with tech company and user company to find out technology and use cases and technical characteristics or the technology.
Advantages and value for the business or the use cases. Such are two pillars I Global Performance has is a very important characteristic of that. So today I'd like to explain about the two major pillars of the Ion Global Forum. Not only the use,
Use cases and the technology, but also that in technical words, we are trying to develop and implement it into the world is the IOM APM, OpenAPM. APM stands for the all photonics network. Of course, we've already utilized the optics in the network.
But the ION OpenAPL means the connecting end-to-end directly with the wavelength bus. And this network provided by the distributed open loader or the
The such optics networks, like as APNI for the interconnect, and APNG is the mark-flexing of the wavelengths, and also the APNT is the transceivers. That's a very useful, the economical way to develop not only the point-to-point connection.
But also that the kind of the wide area of the coverages. And also the use cases types. We have a lot of the members from diverse industries like the automotive industries, chemical industries, rubber cancer institution, or something like that.
They have their own business problems, the business issues to be solved. In the angle problem, they shared their issues and asked the old member how to solve it. I can remember one of the such issues.
The company said to me, I talked with him that this issue is kind of the very important information for you. The sharing is a kind of the disadvantage for the business. He said, no.
Its problem is a kind of the general problem of the industry. So that this is not the competing issues, but also that the collaboration issue to be solved. So that the such kind of the general problem, business problem.
The business issues to be shared in the agricultural forum and also the collaborating with the diverse members to solve that. And not only to sharing such business issues and discussing how to solve it, but also we are trying to.
Develop the kind of the POCs, that means the proof of the value of the Ion Gover From discussion, ION Government activities. A lot of the members of the Ion Governor From tackle to prove their Ion Government technologies or use cases.
Valuable for the real businesses. For example, for the broadcasting station, they have a lot of their business program. So the finally I talked with the some colleagues of the broadcast session. One is the
human lethal tissues. So the when they're baseball game in the stadiums, they should send their tens of the people to the stadium, not only their camelman, but also their uh editors or their controller or the managers.
Yeah, tens of people need it to the one stadium. But the currently we are facing the lack of human resources, it is not easy for them to gather such a lot of tens of people, tens of staff to the one stadium. Another one is
is economical issues. And such stadium, they should bring to the kind of the convoy big truck, including the very expensive editorial editing equipment.
So that they would like to centralize such a editor editoring functions into the their uh center of the editor looms or something. By that they can get the uh
reducing their people, staff, and also that are reducing their uh very expensive uh equipment as well. So that yeah they are very very look forward to develop their this kind of the remote uh TP program uh production uh editing.
In Japan, we collaborate with several work action stations. They are now starting to use this feature in the OSAC export currently being the Operation. Next one is Limo Shuttle.
Uh we tested the this remote surgery program in the northern part of the Japan, uh where the about the thirty kilometer apart the two hospitals connected by the uh iPhone open APM.
Very important feature is that the low zitter, low latency duration. So I talked with the medical doctor. He said, as usual, in the physical surgery or the medical operation,
It is barely natural for him to predict the patient's body, like as a heartbeat or something. So that static latency or node zitter is very, very important to predict the patient's body moving the next time, next time, or something. So that year.
And the glass table shows that ultra-low data is a very good feature for the use cases. And another one is much more the technical side. It is using the LDM over Ion APM. So,
Collaborating with the uh several data centers as for the one data center is very important due to the uh lack of the spaces or lands or lack of the uh electricity uh acquisition. So that the uh existing medium-sized data center
we have should be collaborate each other to provide the similarity to the one big data center. In that purpose is that we would like to try to make it a such kind of the RDMA utilization for the connecting.
The two or three data centers closely. It's a very very good performance of that, and we'd like to continue to this uh activities with much more longer distance. Longer distance means
For example, in Japan, between the Tokyo and Hokkaido, north part of Japan, and for the new regions, not only that the one AGs, but also that they are connecting the region and the region, would be the providing to the such.
Complex or the integrated data center facilities. And also, the expanding the EZLU is very important for the reducing the density of the electricity. If we can put the data centers nearby the sustainable electricity, the US is the
energy site, it is easy for us to get the electricity over land as well. So that if we now should within the 20 or 30 kilometers diameters for the one AGs,
If the we can expand it to the uh fifty or sixty or seventy eighty kilometers, it is uh easy for us to the find out the uh such location to develop the uh uh new data centers for sustainability as well. And also that much more long distance like uh
Between Taiwan and Japan. And their slidier submarine cables are distance about 3,000 kilometers. But their latency is only 70 milliseconds, and zeta is almost zero. So that's a it's a best.
Good for us to develop such the backup system as well. And also the optical circuit. Yeah, to utilize optics more, not only the such electric switches, but also the optical switch.
We can utilize, we can reduce the power consumption dramatically. So that we'd like to utilize a lot of the new technologies to put optical more into the computer side, computer infrastructure.
So, I believe cooperation between the OCP and INGOPAFOR is very, very important. Both of them are the open organization and find out the next generation their IT infrastructure.
From having the characteristics of the use case side. So that using both organizations' capabilities together closely, then we can develop not only the technology, new types of technologies, the problem, but also that they are easy to deploy.
it into the market as well. And also, I'd like to introduce the today afternoon session of the IAN Global Forum challenging by the Kao Shima San that where we are focusing on the network and the computer evolution for the cloud-edge computing.
AI and CPU as well. So please join this session for the deep dive to the IAN Google Reform activities. That's it for the next generation IT infrastructure. Thank you.
Welcome, Seagate Office of the CTO, Chief Technologist, System Mohamed El-Batal. Hello. Thank you very much. It's an honor to be presenting.
At the first OCP APAC, and I appreciate your presence and have a full house today, I guess. That's great. So, today we're going to talk about, again, AI, but specifically the storage layer of AI and the challenges that we're all going to be faced.
The expectation from AI is, as Jensen put it, in the next five years we're going to create more millionaires than 20 years of the internet creation of millionaires. Well, hopefully you all get a share of that, but we have to do a lot of work before we get there.
Because the next five years are full of challenges for every layer of the AI infrastructure. So storage is one of them. And we're participating within the OCP community. We believe in the OCP mission. We want to work with this group of people.
on solving these challenges that will get us to the next generation AI that will hopefully bring more than money. It will bring usefulness to humanity and will allow us to continue to evolve as a nation.
As nations together. So the eventuality of solving challenges requires us to collaborate around the openness of open compute in the areas of storage, in the areas of compute, in the areas of AI. We actually worked very closely.
With the OCP team on the advisory board to provide our opinion of what needs to happen to storage to keep up with the growth of the AI infrastructure. So, we're going to talk about cooling, we're going to talk about interfaces, we're going to talk
About what's in the research center right now that needs to come out and start working on it collaboratively. So, from an aerial density perspective, the industry has had a stall for a while.
Really broke through that is the need for even more storage coming up in the near future. So, as we looked at the evolution of storage, how much data is being created in the internet and mobile and cloud era.
We have gone from one zettabyte to 72 zettabytes in that era. But now, within a shorter period of time, within eight years, we're going to see almost an explosion of that data generated. And when we had, in 2020, we were only storing.
Less than 10% of that 72 zettabytes created. So the goal is to maintain that 10% because that data is money. That data is useful to us. So we need to continue to maintain that level of storage.
In the AI infrastructure, in order for it to be feeding as a model, as well as some of the generated AI coming out of the AI infrastructure. So, with that in mind, this number is faster.
Growing faster than the actual density of the drive. But can we not only increase the density, the aerial density of the drive, but also provide an ecosystem that's friendly in terms of power and sustainability within the data center to be able to double
Number of units in there. So we have to work on creating more data storage, but we also have to connect that storage faster to the compute. Compute is definitely data hungry, and if you stall trying to
Provide data access to, you know, access to the data, your expensive GPUs will actually sit down waiting for that data, and you don't want that. Basically, our job as collectively is to ensure that the data connectivity.
And the data transfers are seamless and simplified in nature. So we're going to talk more about that later on. But to point out, the AI era capacity growth is going to continue. And we're just not going to stop.
at 50 terabyte, you know, because that's still not enough, right? We need more. So as we go on to the next decade, expectation to go to 10 terabyte platters, we're actually getting we're testing today 6.5 terabyte platters in and
in test. And while we're producing 30 to 36 terabyte platters in production. Now, by the time we're shipping 5 terabyte platter, which is 50 terabyte drives, we're going to be testing 100 terabyte, which is the 10 terabyte platters in our lab.
And it will take time for that to reach the industry. So keep in mind, that means we're doing the best we can with hammer technology, with heat-assisted magnetic recording, because without it, we would have stayed incrementing by two terabytes every year.
Which is not enough, right? So we have to double and get more capacity in the AI data center. So, with that, let's talk a little bit about the interface evolution. As we go to 50 terabyte, 80 terabyte,
Terabyte, we need to also increase the speed, but not only the speed, but reduce the congestion of the fabrics on the back end. So, collaboration between the technologies of storage that we have at our disposal, including SSDs and HDs.
Is essential. You know, every technology has its pluses and minuses. We basically cannot say, oh, you know, one technology is going to take over everything. It's not going to happen. We need both. We need lower latency from SSDs, we need higher latency.
Throughput, we need higher density eventually. And then from hard drives, we already have high density. We basically have higher capability to scale at this point in a mass storage because of the cost equation.
And we have higher power efficiency per terabyte. We have lower embodied carbon emissions per terabyte. So, those are together can actually complement each other and produce a storage infrastructure that's massive enough to feed.
The AI generation. So, with that in mind, if both of these technologies are unified around NVMe, the presence of a unified infrastructure and a unified connectivity to the storage would be the same.
NVME non-volatile memory express is named after non-volatile because it was needed to be lower latency and higher throughput. But now it doesn't really matter what is the media, right? It doesn't have to be flash media, it can be magnetic media.
And flash media collaborating to provide a solution that feeds the need of the market. And today, in order for us to connect the mass storage, the hard drive connections, you have to have bridges to convert from SATA to.
To put them in memory on the server, and then you have a server that's gonna feed into the compute infrastructure. That has to be simplified. We wanna simplify the storage and worked with the OCP community in 2022 to generate an
An NVMe HDD specification. That was released, version 1.0 was released, and 129 companies collaborated on the creation of that. But it has not made it to production yet because as you ship 100 millions of drives, you have an infrastructure change that has to happen. You have to have quite a
a bit of infrastructure renovation to maintain that. But once we get there, we can actually improve the data transfer significantly by providing direct GPU memory placement from mass storage and from flash storage.
And together, they can actually reduce the amount of hops the data has to go through. And as you know, we all fly internationally, and nobody wants the connection on their flight. Everybody wants to go direct. And going direct for data is safer.
Less errors, and less data loss potential. So the idea here is try to simplify the amount of conversion, try to simplify the amount of hops, and unify the storage to the point where collaboration is more possible. Instead of adding flow,
Flash to the hard drive or creating a hybrid solution, you make them talk the same language and they can actually protocol-wise collaborate even if they're disaggregated. Next step is to remove any silicon between
You know, the transfer RNIC, the RDMA-capable solution, and the drive, right? So just to simplify and utilize DPUs and RNICs to connect directly to storage, whether it's an NVM.
SSD or an HDD, connectivity with direct connectivity would be the ideal way of doing this. So we basically view the next phase of the storage infrastructure connecting in a much more
Simplified matter in a performance and cost-optimized solution, and to enable speed of ingest of the data. From the point of creating a solution that has all the
Data in one bucket, yet that bucket, if it is all flash, it's expensive. And it's you know, it faces a lot of challenges to keep the power needed for that infrastructure. So, we have actually shown.
That in a perfect world, you want to put your mass data, your your exabytes of and zettabytes of data stored on mass storage and use a layer or a tier of flash to buffer a lot of that transaction, whether it's on, you know,
Egress or ingress, it really needs to have a buffering layer that hides the latency and increases the throughput through utilizing the large number of hard disk drives and funnel it into a more
Capable solid state drive infrastructure that traverses all that the connections into the DPUs or the RNICs to connect with Ethernet, high-speed, high-bandwidth Ethernet to the compute. And then utilize our DMA.
to transfer data from the devices all the way to the GPU memory and directly placed in the GPU is the goal, as well as, you know, on the right, sending the data directly to the drive memory, whether it's an SSD or an HDD.
As multi-tier storage becomes more mature, having the infrastructure support as a unified interface makes that problem a lot easier to implement. With that in mind, you know.
Now that we actually thought through the interface, thought through the density story, we want to make sure the power of cooling is in check. Because although storage is not the most power consuming in the data center, it's actually much smaller than GPUs and CPUs.
As we increase the amount of storage, we want to have this problem sustainable. So it has to be sustainable amount of power and sustainable amount of cooling. So, and there are other aspects as we grow the density, the aerial density, in a platter, that means we're basically
Controlling the density of number of tracks on the media. So we have, you know, the ability to maintain the heads on the track becomes very challenging if we actually have to have, continue to have fan noise disrupting that.
That capability. And as you do, you know, million track per inch or more, that's quite a bit harder and harder as we grow into the density number of tracks per inch and the bit per inch as well. It becomes a necessity for us to look at.
Alternatives for fan because just speeding up the fans and putting more fans that means you're basically creating more noise. And if you slow down the fans to help with the noise, the temperature of the drive goes up and the failures start going up as well because mechanical devices don't like high.
Temperatures in that environment. So it's kind of a balancing act we've been playing for the last 30, 40 years in this market. But the ease of transition now that we have other technologies at our disposal.
And the modern data center is starting to explore more and more water-cooled infrastructure with vapor chambers, making it into your cell phone, into your laptop, into the data center. Vapor chambers are much more efficient than standard coal plate.
Technology with copper alone. So, the combination of both, we believe, at least we've done some research and simulations, and we're going to show you some data, that the combination of both and the utilization of the modern data center water cooling infrastructure could be alternatives to air cool, to fan cooling.
Which, with all honesty, I think it can continue, but for the next decade, as we go into much higher densities, we have to think and work together on how do we get a better cooling technology that not only helps with the noise, but reduces it.
Temperature further. By reducing the temperature, maybe five to ten degrees, you can actually double the life of the devices. So, those are the things we want to think about. If you double the life of the devices, you can actually reduce the amount of traffic to rebuild. We have, you know, we have improvements.
In that infrastructure, with regards to less traffic on the fabric, on the network, because rebuilds mean you have to do multiple traversals of transfers within the fabric without really sending the data to the user on that. So ideally, we
We want to get denser and denser storage, go to, you know, from 60 to 72 to all the way to 112, maybe even more, right? Because if you don't need to leave enough room between the drives to allow for air to go through, you can put the very thin vapor chamber, maybe a one millimeter vapor chamber.
Enough, and you can actually utilize the ASHRAE standards-based, you know, W27 or W29 to cool that infrastructure of the drives without having to run air between. So it's a box, think about it, similar to
What we do in compute, but in a different term, because we're not cooling thousand-watt devices, we're cooling ten-watt devices. And that basically requires us to, you know, be very cost-effective, and we have to be very aggressive.
In terms of cooling as many drives as we can in a smaller space to double the density. So, basically, what that would give us, if we can bring down the temperature, we've shown, we've run a lot of simulations and we've done some POCs that showed there are options.
Options that can get us down to 45 degrees C on the drive, which is that's a max temperature of a hard drive. It's a very optimal temperature. You know, it could be a little bit higher, but you know, we can play around with this and achieve a standard spec for the future that would help us.
Reduce errors, reduce failure rates, improve reliability, improve availability, and help with the serviceability of the solution. Now, what that means at the end is better optimize sustainability in TCO. And that's what we want to do to be able to scale and store more of this.
Data that we're creating in the data center. So I hope this kind of helps. And we have, I personally have three sessions in the storage track later on this afternoon. I welcome people to join so we can talk about this and see how we can collaborate to better solve some of these.
Challenges again. Thank you very much. Please welcome Supermicro's Director of Technology Enablement, R.T. Huang.
Good morning, ladies and gentlemen. My name is A. T. Huang, and I am an active contributor to the Cooling Environment Work Group on Emergent TCO and the director at the Supermicro.
Over the past three years, I have been dedicated to improving pivotal aspects of calculating the total cost of ownership of liquid-cooled IT equipment. As new coolant methods, technologies, and cooling solutions emerge, I have had the opportunity to work with other TCO experts and in-house.
This OCP TCO model, making it as accurate and comprehensive as possible. TCO stands for Total Cost of Ownership. Why is TCO tool important? Well, we all expect to save money to enable data centers to.
Be built and rebuilt within power constraints and to reduce water and electricity consumption based on data center location. Not all locations are equally attractive for data center deployment. The OGP workgroup's vision is that a TCO tour should be open.
PA reviewed an industry platform that models capex, OPECs, and sensitivities across a broad range of data center power and cooling options. It should obtain widespread adoption and provide immediate assistance in guiding customers to more informed decision making.
The industry has a wide range of TCO tools, but many are proprietary bread boxes. I'm a former editor and the primary author of the Green Green Virgin 3 and Virgin 4 liquid cooling TCO calculate. At OCP,
Openness is fundamental in collaboration, software and methodology. We aim to create a transparent tool that lets users understand the calculations, compare configurations using benchmark reference design, and allow vendors to provide data for fair assessment.
The tool is the product of the co-chairs Andy Young at Esperitus and Eddie Royman at Microsoft. Together with other contributors, we envisioned the tool. Let's suppose that it's
Trusted advisor, whether IT providers, tech vendors, CIT teams, or manufacturers to guide smarter decisions. It's not about giving exact dollar amount, but offering directional insights. We want this tool to be useful, highlighting key trade-offs and helping users decide air directly.
Chip, emergent, hybrid, or whatever is coming next. My agenda includes two main sessions: model overview and model formalization. Here is our current state of TCO development.
In OCP, complete, ongoing, and not started. I would like to walk through the ongoing items: trader COP seasonal variation, airport reference locations for environment zone, technical reference documentation. Also, those gap items need support from outside.
Workgroup, both other OCP groups and the collaborators who can work within an open environment. Essentially, the model solves a set of energy conservation equations for the facility, accounting for the performance and efficiency of each process and.
Of processes contained within. There are 66 equations being solved simultaneously. This is the reference architecture with power, the green arrows from utility connections for critical power and mechanical power. A set of up to four data rooms, including the red arrows, throw.
Via two pathways, hydrogen units, HRU, for low temperature and high-temperature chilled water. This table shows the purpose of which you sail in worksheets along with color reference. The critical power has two power outlets, one from
The main switchboard and one from the UPS. The output from the UPS is for air cooling, known as CRAV. The output from UPS is for critical equipment such as servers and CDUs. The UPS outlet is reported for L1 PUE assessment.
The mechanical power has a single outlet from the switchboard and fixed HRUs, compressors, fan sets, and economizers. Power equipment is selected based on critical and mechanical power configurations. There are two HRUs, one with
A low temperature set point for air-cooled IT equipment, and another with a high-temperature set point for liquid-cooled IT equipment. Each HIU has two power inlets: one from critical power and fits the pump set for water circulation, and one from mechanical power to fit the component.
Compressors, fan sets, and free coolers. Cooling equipment is selected based on air and liquid cooling configurations. Each data center can contain up to four data rooms, and each data room can contain up to four types of clusters with clusters.
CRAP for air-cooled and CTUs for liquid-cooled equipment. Each cluster may include up to three rank types. The PDU output is reported for LO2 PUE assessment. Each rig may include up to three change types. The REC PDU output is reported for LO3.
PUE assessment. Each chase models capacitor scaling and separates node power from internal overheads. The power input to the nodes is reported for L4 PUE assessment. The model includes a flexible and open equipment library.
It covers everything from cheaters and dry coolers to tanks, racks, and servers. While it includes public temporary data, vendors can also contribute their data for use in private versions of the model. For example, you can select a UPS from a pull-down menu. The associated library
Library entry includes performance matches, capital cost, efficiency, flow space, and so forth. Each configuration is stored as a worksheet. You can create multiple configurations and compare them side by side.
The tool outputs key efficiency matrix from the scenarios modeled, peak and average PUE, energy reuse factor, water use efficiency, CUE workload density. Also, key financial metrics of the scenarios modeled. CapEx OPEX amortization payment.
Capex per watt of workload. In addition, it breaks down resource usage such as power, cooling, and flow space. Furthermore, the tool offers a detailed financial breakdown. It shows how equipment and building costs contribute to capex and how resource overheads contribute to the capability.
Contribute to OPECS. Snyder Electric has supported this effort by providing two baseline designs. This is a comparison with reference design RD65 in 2018, which is an air-cooled greenfield data center with a reference.
density of six kilowatt per reg homogeneous setup. Here are the IT deployment and facility power block diagrams. For this benchmark comparison, three locations representing different azure rate climate zones were selected.
Typical meteorological year TMY dry bulb temperature data were used to estimate the annual proportion of economization hours for low temperature hydrogenation unit based on a critical threshold of 10 degrees C. For example, low temperature hydration unit economization is active.
For 1% of the year in Miami compared to 39% in St. Louis and 54% in Montreal. The model closely matches Snyder's reported values, PUE within 3%, and flower space within 7%.
Percent overall within two percent for IT space. There were no capex or OPEX values published in Snyder's reports, so financial results here are for reference only. Still, it's a strong validation of the model's underlying structure.
Currently, we rely on HRA environmental zones, which comprise nineteen distinct climate zones. However, this approach lacks sufficient granularity. Trader and economizer performance can vary significantly even within the same climate zone.
To improve the accuracy of mechanical energy modelling, we plan to compile climate data from all airport weather stations as these locations consistently maintain meteorological monitoring equipment. Users will be able to select the nearest airport to simulate concrete.
Of a specific data center location. It is recognized that among all four mechanical energies, compressors, pumps, fans, and hydrogen units, compressor energy accounts for the largest ratio in overall mechanical energy.
Energy. So it makes sense to have elaborate trader energy calculation with dynamic COP, which is subject to climate data and the data room set point temperatures. This QR code links to the ocean.
OGP cooling environment grocery harmonized codes, reserved colors, and terms curated by OGP subject matter experts. So the TCO model is openly unambiguous in its definitions, calculations, and results.
Finally, we encourage you to download the model and join the workgroup. You can scan the QR codes for assistance on this model, contact with your name, virtual you are running, and cross streets. You can email to tco at ogproject.net. We will monitor this and get back to the project.
Back to you. Thank you for your time. And if you expect further discussions, I may be available at the Supermicro booth, booth number G11. Thank you. Please welcome Broadcom.
Senior VP and General Manager, Ram Vallega.
Good morning. Welcome. And it's exciting to be here. What the main thing I want to share with you today is the role that networking is playing in building these very large computational models. You've seen the presentation from Meta earlier.
Today. A couple of main takeaways from me when I saw that presentation. Though, actually, the main, one of the big ones was towards the end of the presentation that said we are only at the one percentile mark in the journey that we've just started. And I want you to kind of think about it as we go through this presentation.
Here, you look at machine learning, it's a massive distributed computing system, right? And when a distributed computing system is very, very large, what you're doing is sometimes you're scaling inside a rack, and that's not sufficient. And when you scale inside a rack, it's what we refer to as.
As a scale-up. But then you go beyond a few racks, many racks inside the data center, and you think of it as an scale-out. And oftentimes, you are not able to fit everything inside one data center, and you have to go beyond a data center. And that's when you start thinking about.
connecting many, many data centers together. So across all of these different topologies, whether it's inside one rack, across multiple racks, or across the data centers, you need to be able to provide a network that allows this very large distributed compute system to scale, right?
And that's what we are super focused on. And for many years now, we've taken the position that the best way to build a large distributed computing system is to do it on Ethernet. And I want to kind of share with you some of the progress that we have made and also the path forward in terms.
Of how to continue to build these very large systems. For the first part, I will focus a little bit on the scale-up. When you think about scale-up, there's a lot of bandwidth that's required to connect these systems on a scale-up. There's different proprietary technologies, NV-Link or something else,
To do scale-up, but the important aspect of all of this is that you need a lot of bandwidth. Why do you need a lot of bandwidth for scale-up? It's because of this. When you think about an XPU or a GPU, right, it may have four HPMs connected to it, could have eight HPMs connected to it. The bandwidth of each
Of these HPMs connecting to the XPUs today is about 10 terabits, just rounding up, right? So when you have four HPMs connected to an XPU, you have 40 terabits per second of bandwidth that is between the HPM and the XPU. In the next
Year or so, what you'll start to see is you'll start to see eight HPMs connected to an XPU, each of them which is an HPM4. Now you're talking about close to 100 terabits per second bandwidth between the HPM and the XPU. Now think about it. If you have two XPUs or seven
70 XPUs or so many more connected to each other, and you want them to exchange the data between each other, the data is moving from the HBM on one XPU to the HPM on the other XPU, right? So that means the network that's connecting these different XPUs also has to be very, very high bandwidth.
And that is what you think of as scale-up networking. So, when you're connecting it at very high bandwidth, what do you need in terms of the network attributes? One, obviously, you need very high bandwidth. Think about it. Today, I'll just go back for a second. Today, some of the largest HPM
Sorry, largest devices you have is a 100-terabit switch. But if you have 100 terabits per second bandwidth between the HPM and XPU for one device, and you're trying to attach many of these, you can easily consume a lot of switches, right? So it requires a lot of bandwidth, that's one. Two, when you're
moving the data from one XPU to another XPU, that data transfer has to be very, very efficient. When you say efficient, what do you mean? You're basically saying, look, just make sure it's low latency. Make sure you're not adding a lot of overheads to the data that's being moved to keep it efficient.
Third is you want to make sure that connection is very reliable. So, when you're moving the data from one HPM to another HPM on a different XPU, you may have some issues on the links, you may have some link flaps, copper bitterer rates, whatever it is. You want to make sure you're making that link very, very reliable. So, one of the other things I hope you have to do is.
You noticed in the presentation from Meta this morning was: if you think about scale-up today, it is in the tens. When I say tens, it may be 30, it may be 70, or pick a number between zero but less than 100. But going forward in the next year or so, the size of that scale-up is going to get larger.
You know, first you'll see hundreds, and probably in a couple of years, it could hit the very high hundreds, maybe even hit a thousand. Why? When you increase the size of the scale-up domain, the software model becomes very simple. Actually, I shouldn't say very simple, the software model becomes simpler. Okay? So if it was possible.
Possible today, the scale-up would already be larger than a number that is 36, 72, whatever you pick. So then, what limits the scale-up from getting larger? Number one is the copper. If you think about all these chassis which have been built today, they're all based on a copper backplane, and there's a certain region.
On the copper backplane, and there's only so many XPUs or GPUs you can fit within the reach of that copper. That's one. You know, two is if you're trying to connect, you know, these, let's say, 100 plus or 500 XPUs, you need a switch that has a high radix. And then, three, obviously, the switch also has.
When I say high radics, it's a number of devices it can connect to. And then, number three, what you also need is a switch that requires a lot of bandwidth or is capable of providing a lot of bandwidth. So, what we are driving in the industry is enabling these very large scale-ups beyond less than 100 to many hundreds.
With what even Meta showed in their presentation this morning. And to do that, what do you need to do? First, you need to go beyond the reach of copper, and then you have to go onto optics. When you go onto optics, you need to make sure the optics are lower cost, lower power, and scalable, right? And then you also have to increase the speed per lane. You go from 100 gigs.
To 200 gig 30s, in the future, maybe go towards 400 gig 30s. The other thing you're obviously going to do is when you're going to have such a high density of XPUs in a particular location. Now, this could be inside a rack, or once you start to go to multiple hundreds, you may not be inside a rack, you may actually have a scale-up domain.
That's growing across multiple racks. So, you're always going to be careful about the amount of power it consumes, and you want to be on the most advanced process nodes to get to the lowest power profile that you can. So, the main takeaway I want you to have on this slide is the things that have confined us today to the scale-up domains.
Being less than 100 are going to be changed very soon. First, you'll have a switch that's going to have a higher radius, you'll have a switch that's going to have a higher bandwidth point, you're going to go to faster 30 speeds, and then soon you'll transition from copper to optics to be able to get you a larger scale-up. And it's going to happen because that just makes us more.
A lot more simpler to build. Now, when you're building these scale-up networking devices, what are the things that you want to keep in mind? You want it to be low latency, okay? And low latency, you're talking about a couple of hundred nanoseconds of latency would be ideal, right? Then, when you're transferring the
data from one HPM to another HPM, any packet headers that you add to the data transfer has to be efficient, which is you don't want to have a very large packet header for a small amount of data being transferred. So that's what you mean by efficient headers. Next is link level retry.
Which is, if you have any packet drops, or if you have any packet corruptions, you want to be able to quickly re-transmit the packet without having to go and burden the host again. And then, lastly, but definitely not the least, in the scale-up system, you may have a situation where many XPUs are trying to talk to one XPU at once, and you need to have.
Some kind of a congestion control within that scale-up domain. So, these are the main attributes of what you want to have in terms of an scale-up networking. So, we at Broadcom very strongly believe, and you'll actually start to see products coming out in the next three to six months, that scale-up should.
Be done on Ethernet. Because, as we've always said before, Ethernet is the most ubiquitously available technology, most economically available technology. It's available for multiple vendors, and it's absolutely open, right? Truly the most open technology that's out there. So, what we have worked with the OCP.
Community and the OCP leadership team here is to contribute the whole specification for how scale-up can be built on Ethernet so that variety of GPU XPU vendors can start to put that IP into their XPUs on building these large scale-up systems with Ethernet.
Okay, now with this Ethernet scale-up that is possible, you can actually go from an XPU through a switch and back to the other XPU, and all of this in less than 400 nanoseconds. Okay, less than 40 nanoseconds.
Out of that 400 nanoseconds, about 250 nanoseconds is in the Ethernet switch. Remaining 150 is going up and down the host stack. This is an amazingly low latency. And this is possible.
we actually have the specification for it and this is called SU, very simply standing for scale-up Ethernet. And it's available for everybody to take a look at and implement in their devices. Now the Ethernet switch that I've shown you there that has sub two hundred and fifty nanoseconds you know latency, that's the device that we have here.
Which is called Tomahawk Ultra, and it's a 250 nanoseconds latency device at 50 terabits of bandwidth. It's available now for sampling, and we will start to see customer deployments happening with this as the Ethernet switch in there.
Now, we talked about scale up. Let me talk about scale out. When you talk about scale out, there's two different scale outs, one that happens inside the data center, and then one that happens between the data centers. When you look at what happens inside the data centers itself, right, obviously
To this journey of super intelligence, you need many GPUs clustered together. Inside a physical data center, today you probably will fit many tens of thousands. By the end of this year, maybe actually, there will be a couple of data centers that will have close to 200,000 in one physical data center. But obviously, to connect
A million, you'll need to exceed one physical data center. So, zooming in on what happens inside one physical data center, right, if you think about it, if you want to build a cluster that is 128,000 GPUs, there's two ways you can build it. You can build it either with the switch that is 50 terabits of bandwidth, okay, or
Or you can build it with a switch that is 100 terabits of bandwidth. And you look at the difference, what happens is when you are able to build it with a switch that's 100 terabits of bandwidth, as you can even just see in this picture, it's a lot simpler network. Okay? And obviously, you need a 100 terabit switch to build a network that looks like this and broadening.
About a month ago, we introduced our Tomahawk 6 switching chip that is the fastest switch in the marketplace with 100 terabits of bandwidth to build these very large clusters inside the data center. Now, just to give you a
An idea of how much simpler it is to build it with a 100-terabit switch versus a 50-terabit switch, I wanted to give you a quick comparison here. If you built the same cluster of about 128,000 GPUs and built it with two tiers using a 100-terabit switch, you basically have far fewer optics, about 67% fewer optics.
It's lower latency because you don't go through multiple switch hops before you complete the journey. And it also gets you higher reliability because the lesser the optics, the lesser the links, you know, the network is far more stable. It also increases performance quite a bit. And the reason it increases performance.
Is when you go beyond a two-tier network to a three-tier network, the chances of congestion and load balancing not being extremely efficient increases significantly. So, overall, you improve the entire performance of the system, not just the network, by building a network that is very scalable.
In a two-tier topology. And when you have fewer switches, fewer optics, fewer cables, and a higher performing system, obviously you will also consume a lot less power. Now, one of the things that I also wanted to leave you with today is it's not just about being inside a data center, right? Because today when you look at a lot of these data centers,
They are not capable of putting even 200,000 GPUs in there, let alone a million. So you want to be able to take advantage of many of the 50, 60 gigawatt data centers, 60 megawatt data centers that exist today, and connect a couple of these 50, 60 megawatt data centers to create.
A 200 gigawatt data center that can host maybe 100,000 XPUs/slash GPUs. So, to do that, Broadcom just today introduced our latest chip. It's an AI fabric router, right? And the reason this is different from the Tomahawk class of devices is in this
Device, you have very deep buffering. As you can see, this is a multi-dye chip, and I know it's probably hard to see from there, but it has a lot of HBMs in there. And what it allows you to do is be able to actually connect data centers which are over 60 miles or 100 kilometers apart.
By doing that, now you're able to build a very large cluster across different data centers. And also, it has encryption on it line rate, full speed, so that when you're going beyond one physical data center across different data centers, you can make sure the data that is going across them is safe. So I just want to summarize.
By saying, when we are building these large machine learning clusters, network plays an extremely important role. Network is the computer. And what the network is doing is it's allowing you to scale up inside a rack, scale out across multiple racks, and also scale out across data centers.
All based on Ethernet. Okay? And Ethernet is the fastest technology that's out there, it is the most open, and it is also the most economical and the cheapest technology that's out there to scale at these bandwidth points. So that's what we're doing. We're looking at this problem holistically, completing the portfolio all the way from.
From INRAC scale-up to scale-out to a cross-data center scale-out. But last thing I want to leave you with: to make this happen, this community that participates in OCP is the most important part of bringing this to fruition. Because we can build these chips, but we require this community to be able to build the hardware that goes.
Goes around it. It requires this community to put the software on top of it to take this to production. But also, more importantly, with this community, we are able to actually work to enhance the state of art of Ethernet. Nobody imagined doing scale-up over Ethernet a couple of years ago, and today we are doing it. And we're very thankful for the OCP community to.
To actually work with us to open up the spec. But also, there will be a working stream that's going to be set up that will allow you to continue to add and contribute to the spec to make it stronger. And it's truly open. There's no licensing, there's no IP restrictions. We don't tell you who you can connect to, who you can talk to. All of you should be able to build.
And prosper on this Ethernet ecosystem. Thank you very much.
Google's Director of ML Systems and Cloud AI, Chris Verne.
Good morning. I get the coveted last speech before lunch spot, so please bear with me, even if you're hungry. The other advantage of going last is I got to see all of the
great presentations that all the partners have given before me. And it was really encouraging to see the common themes around collaboration, around openness, and around the challenges of AI. So surprise, surprise, I'm going to talk about AI.
Now, I've been in the industry for about 30 years, and I love the chart that Robert put up from AMD that showed all these technological revolutions over the last 30, 40 years. But I really believe that AI may be the most transformative. You know, we all know AI has captured the imagination of billions of people.
Of people around the world. And it's captured not only imagination, but I think it's captured mind share of IT leaders and business professionals across many industries. Now, for the true potential of AI to be realized, we need to establish trust in the underlying.
Underlying systems and trust in the underlying infrastructure. So that's what I'm going to talk about today. It's no surprise that over the past few years, Google has seen a step-function increase in AI and machine learning deployments. Again, no surprise. And this is driving significant increased demand.
For space and power to house and drive these massive deployments. Now, this growth is fueled by significant increases in computational performance, both at a device level but also at a pod level. Google recently released our seventh-generation TPU, Ironwood. And if you compare the pod level,
Level configuration for ironwood to the previous generation, it's 10 times higher performance. But at the same time, performance is increasing, power efficiency is increasing as well. So ironwood is also five times as power efficient as its V5 predecessor. And if you compare it to V2,
Which was released less than a decade ago, it's 29 times more efficient. Now, while individual TPUs and other devices are becoming more power efficient, the trend towards larger devices as well as more densely packed pods is driving overall power density much, much higher. If we look
At a rack level, for example, the trend for rack-level power for traditional computing storage has remained and is projected to maintain fairly constant. But if you compare that to racks that are dedicated to AI training and serving, significant and rapid growth in rack-level power.
And it's expected to continue for the next few years. So, capable and efficient power distribution as well as cooling strategies are really key to support this ongoing growth. Now, to address these challenges, Google leverages our long-standing collaboration with partners in OCP to drive industry collaboration.
And open innovation and infrastructure. At the OCP EMIA summit earlier this year, we talked about this transition from traditional 48-volt level infrastructure to plus or minus 400-volt, which will enable rack-level powers to increase from 100 kilowatts.
Up to one megawatt. Now, traditional rack solutions integrate the power and the compute within the same rack. But part of Mount Diablo, we're moving all of the power conversion into a separate rack, a disaggregated power rack.
the power increases for these GPU and TPU systems generate significant heat, obviously, especially in high-dense clusters. So cooling itself becomes more energy intensive, therefore increasing the potential for overall carbon management within the data center.
The growth in data center infrastructure presents real opportunities for innovation and cooling as well as power. Now, while Google's been deploying liquid in our data center since about 2018 and other niche applications, there have been liquid deployments for decades. We're seeing a rapid increase in liquid deployments at the data center level.
Water has the capability of conducting heat much better than air, and it can transport 3,000 to 4,000 times more heat per unit volume than air. So we released our 0.75 spec for our Deschute CDU, and that'll be available on the portal soon. These are just two recent examples of
Google's long-standing and deep engagement with partners via OCP. Together, we've aligned the ecosystem across numerous domains, from security to sustainability to hardware management, across system domains, from compute to storage to networking, and obviously acceleration.
And we've worked with partners at device level, at the system level, and the data center level. And so I'm continuing this common theme you've heard all morning about the importance of openness and collaboration and the value of OCP. Now, all of these rapid technology demands or technology advances.
Are really required for AI deployments at scale. And again, collaboration and open standards are really critical to addressing these technology challenges. So I want to talk a little about, let's get back to the theme of powering trust. I'm going to talk about security, I'm going to talk about resilience, and I'm going to talk a little bit about validation.
Because we need to build security and resilience from the ground up in order to, again, ensure that there's trust in the underlying infrastructure. And Google is teaming up with many partners in OCP to address all the aspects of security. Again, from the fundamental silicon level to the management level and to auditing.
ecosystem. But building a sufficient, secure architecture really requires a composable architecture that can be adapted to meet the specific needs of compute, of storage, of accelerators, and also application-specific devices.
And to build a truly composable architecture, we need open standards. We need to leverage open standards, and we need to leverage modularity. So Calyptra, I know one of the other presenters talked about Calyptra. It's an open source project that provides integrated root of trust at the silicon level, specifically targeting data center class hardware.
And its core function is to establish a cure foundation, again, at the silicon level. Provides a fundamental set of capabilities for an SOC: unique identity, a measured boot process to ensure that the right firmware is loaded on the device, and attestation capabilities.
To verify the system state through cryptography. Now, LOCK, I think LOCK was mentioned in one of the other presentations as well. Lock is providing cryptographic key management for storage devices, specifically NVMe SSDs. And it provides a key management solution that contains elements out.
Outside the device itself, which protects the device in case of either threat or loss, which significantly increases the overall security posture of storage. SAFE is another OCP initiative that Google's working on with key partners. This provides a framework.
To standardize the auditing process. And the outcome of this will be a vetted set of partners who can perform audits. This will really expand the availability of auditing services across the industry and also save system companies and technology companies time and effort. So, again, the intent is to really expand auditing capabilities.
Across the industry. Google and Microsoft spearheaded the creation of SAFE in 2023 in collaboration with OCP, and other partners have joined. So let's talk a little bit about resilience. Another key element of building trust is building resilience into the underlying infrastructure. And Google's working with a number of partners on key aspects of resilience.
One I want to talk about is silent data corruption. It's one such area of deep collaboration with partners across the industry. And as we scale compute and storage, the frequency and the impact of silent data corruption has the potential to grow significantly. Some history. Google shared our initial findings on SDC in 2021.
In a paper titled Cores That Don't Count, which really talked about the challenges of finding silent data corruption in hyperscale environments. Following that in 2022, a group of partners came together in OCP, AMD, ARM, Google, Intel, Meta, Microsoft, and NVIDIA, came together to really dedicate resources to silent.
Data corruption. And in 2024, the server-compliant resilience spec 1.0 was published, standardizing key elements such as test, input, and outputs, metrics, part history, and also test frameworks and flows. Now, one of the things this resulted in was a fairly unique collaboration.
between industry and academia. Google and partners funded over a million dollars for universities to really focus on novel techniques of addressing both finding but also resolving silent data corruption. And we continue to believe that this type of open partnership between academia and industry is really critical.
To success going forward. So, very proud of this. Now, one of the core challenges of AI is to ensure that the subtle hardware errors that can manifest as silent data corruption don't undermine the integrity and the accuracy and the trustworthiness of the models that are deployed at scale, which is important.
Given the unique workload characteristics of AI. So, another set of partners have come together and been collaborating on a paper specifically focused on addressing sound data corruption in AI. And this set of partners brings together a wealth of experience in high-performance computing, in hyperscale AI deployments, and one of the outcomes.
Of this is to direct future research into solid data corruption. So, let's talk a bit about validation. When you're developing all this great technology around security or around resilience, you need methods to validate that you're delivering what you say you're going to deliver. So, it's another area that Google collaborates with partners on.
And we really need to continue to invest in validation. So there's a set of partners that came together and defined three GPU specifications at OCP over the last few years. These were specifications aimed at standardizing things like firmware updates and RAS and management.
Interfaces for accelerators. This is really crucial for enabling seamless, impactless updates, ensuring consistent error reporting, and programmatic control across what's becoming an increasingly diverse multi-vendor accelerator environment that we're seeing in our data centers today. And the goal is really to boost operational.
Operational efficiency, reliability, and interoperability. And the 1.0 versions of these specs were published last year. Now, talking about validation, one of the things key to effective validation is improving debug and RAS capability. So, Google, Microsoft, and AMD have come together to develop standards for how system crashes.
Are captured and analyzed to define requirements for crash dumps, and to create standardized processes for collecting debug data in production. And so we're working together on impactless firmware updates for CPUs, for example. This is really important, as I mentioned before, about the heterogeneous nature of accelerators.
the data center. Well, there's also increasingly heterogeneous CPU topologies in the data center. That drives the potential for more frequent updates in the data center, which means the impact of seamless and non-disruptive firmware updates is really increasingly critical.
One other area of validation that Google has been working on is the development of a standard test module to support the new APEC-I.O. format. Google developed a standard test module to support the PCI compliance testing as well as the electrical and protocol testing, which ensures interoperability.
And one of my colleagues, Erica, is going to giving a talk on this tomorrow afternoon. So please check that on your agenda. Okay, so before I close, I want to talk a bit about this wonderful place we've all gathered, which is Taiwan. I mentioned I've been in the industry about 30 years, and a third of that time I've spent living and working in Taiwan.
And I think Taiwan really has a unique place, or maybe a unique place outside the U.S. in terms of what comes together to deliver success, openness, and collaboration in this space. So, many of the partners that I mentioned that Google's working with are in Taiwan. And Google has a track record of sustaining.
sustained investment in infrastructure here in Taiwan. We take advantage of a unique combination of capabilities that Taiwan offers. And since we opened our data center and launched our cloud region over a decade ago, we've continued to invest in infrastructure, in new capabilities, new skills, and new capabilities.
From core engineering to manufacturing to sustainability. So, when I talk about unique capabilities, what do I mean? So, first, there is a deep engineering and supply chain expertise in Taiwan built over many decades. Second, we have the key system design and manufacturing partners here in Taiwan.
That works on many of the systems that we deploy in our data centers worldwide. And we also have technology partners here on the island working on core technology across silicon, across cooling, across thermal, across power. And in the past year, we just celebrated the 10th anniversary of Data Center.
Right down the road in Chonghua. This proximity of capabilities in a relatively small space, at least for Google, has proven to provide tremendous efficiencies in terms of decision-making and execution. So, in closing, I want to echo the sentiment you've heard all.
Morning about the importance of openness and collaboration. And I think the Taiwan ecosystem is one that's uniquely positioned for leadership in data center technology, both at a chip level and at the system level. So let's work together to continue our collaboration and raise the bar on security, reliability, and validation together. Thank you.
Please welcome Chief Marketing Officer of the Open Compute Project, Dirk Vans Lyke.
Good afternoon. Thank you so much for being here and for sticking around. Can we give our speakers one more round of applause? Obviously, a lot of work went into those speeches. They spent a lot of time.
Coming here, and it was just a great round of presentations, so we really appreciate that. So, that's the end of our keynotes. The expo hall is set to open, which also is where lunch is going to be served. And by the way, there will also be plenty of coffee and tea. We know we didn't have coffee this morning, so there's going to be plenty of coffee and tea available as well.
In the afternoon, we're going to break out into our breakout sessions. There's five different tracks, including the Future Technologies Symposium. And then this evening, we've got our welcome reception. And then tomorrow, we've got also two different sections of breakout sessions with five different tracks, and lunch will be provided.
We want to make a big round of thank you to our sponsors. We really couldn't put on an event like this if it wasn't for our sponsors, so thank you for your support. Exactly. And last, a special thank you to our partners and our co-hosts, the AI on chip.
Taiwan Allowance, Alliance, rather, and the Cloud Computing and IoT Association in Taiwan. Thank you for your time. We hope you have an amazing next couple of days, and let's go have fun.
